Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-1005
Records; preservation duplicate; admissible in evidence; destruction of original record.

The clerk of any district court or of any other court of record may maintain any court record as a preservation duplicate in the manner provided in section 84-1208. The original record may be destroyed only with the approval of the State Records Administrator pursuant to the Records Management Act. The reproduction of the preservation duplicate shall be admissible as evidence in any court of record in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1967, c. 134, § 1, p. 419;

Laws 1969, c. 105, § 2, p. 480;

Laws 1971, LB 128, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-337.02;

Laws 2020, LB1028, § 2.

Records Management Act, see section 84-1220.